Utah statutes.
53A-15-404.   Eligibility.

(1)  Adult education classes are open to every person 18 years of age or over and to any person who has completed high school.

(2)  Eligible nonresidents of the state shall be charged tuition at least equal to that charged nonresident students for similar classes at a local or nearby state college or university, unless waived in whole or in part by the local school board in an open meeting.

(3)  The district superintendent may, upon the recommendation of an authorized representative of the Division of Child and Family Services, exempt an adult domiciled in Utah from the payment of adult education fees.

